Hawaii statutes.
§431:11-112 Receivership. Whenever it
appears to the commissioner that any person has committed a violation of this
article which so impairs the financial condition of a domestic insurer as to
threaten insolvency or make the further transaction of business by it hazardous
to its policyholders, creditors, shareholders, or the public, then the
commissioner may proceed as provided in article 15 to take possession of the
property of the domestic insurer and to conduct the business thereof. [L 1987,
c 349, pt of §8]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next